Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1882XS (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 38 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 327F.33 Crew size ââ penalties. 1 1. A locomotive or railroad train operated by a class I rail 2 carrier or class II rail carrier, as those terms are defined by 3 the federal surface transportation board, when operating on a 4 railroad track in connection with the movement of passengers or 5 freight, shall be operated by a crew consisting of at least two 6 qualified railroad employees. 7 2. a. A railroad company found guilty of violating 8 subsection 1 shall, upon conviction, be subject to one of the 9 following penalties: 10 (1) For a first offense, a schedule âthreeâ penalty as 11 provided in section 327C.5. 12 (2) For a second or subsequent offense, a schedule âfiveâ 13 penalty as provided in section 327C.5. A second offense under 14 this section shall be a first violation for the purposes of 15 calculating the schedule âfiveâ penalty. 16 b. For purposes of determining whether a conviction is a 17 first, second, or subsequent offense, only offenses committed 18 within the three-year period prior to the most recent offense 19 shall be considered. 20